District of Columbia statutes.
9-312

South Dakota Avenue Bridge.

No street railway company shall use the bridge authorized by the Act of March 3, 1917 (39 Stat. 1018), for its tracks until such company shall have paid to the Treasurer of the United States a sum equal to one-sixth of the total cost of said bridge, to the credit of the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 3, 1917, 39 Stat. 1018, ch. 160
Feb. 22, 1921, 41 Stat. 1144, ch. 70, § 7
June 28, 1944, 58 Stat. 533, ch. 300, § 18

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-512.
1973 Ed., § 7-512.